Louisiana, session 2026, HB755.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2316 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 38:2310(11) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2310. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings
hereinafter set forth unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
* * *
(11) "Indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity professional design services
contract" means a master contract for professional design services where an agency
can issue multiple, separate task orders to the designer for different design efforts.
* * *
§2316. Applicability; indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity professional design
services contracts
A. Except as provided in R.S. 38:2311(C), the provisions of this Part shall
not apply to professional design service contracts in which the estimated construction
project budget cost is one million dollars or less.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 755 ENROLLED
B.(1) Except as provided in R.S. 38:2311(C), the selection of professional
design services contracts allowing for indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity
design services shall be governed by the provisions of this Section.
(2)(a) Each agency intending to contract for indefinite delivery and indefinite
quantity professional design services shall notify the division of administration of
such intention and shall provide the division of administration with all necessary
information concerning the scope of services sought. The division of administration
shall then evaluate the proposed indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity
professional design services sought for purposes of determining the professional
services to be required in order to refer the agency request to the proper board. The
division of administration shall then advise the chairmen of the boards as to which
selection board the proposed agency request has been referred.
(b) If the chairman of any of the three professional selection boards referred
to in this Subparagraph objects to a referral made by the division of administration,
that objection shall be submitted to the division of administration, and the division
of administration shall submit the information concerning the proposed agency
request to a committee composed of the following:
(i) The chairman of the Louisiana Architects Selection Board.
(ii) The chairman of the Louisiana Engineers Selection Board.
(iii) The chairman of the Louisiana Landscape Architects Selection Board.
(iv) The head, or representative named by the head, of the user agency whose
request is under consideration, and the commissioner of the division of
administration or his designee.
(c) The members of the committee, by majority vote, shall designate which
selection board shall have the authority and responsibility for selecting the design
professionals and shall notify the division of administration of its decision. The
division of administration shall notify the board which has been designated the
responsibility of selecting the design professionals.
(d) The designated board shall then advertise one time in the official state
journal the following information:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 755 ENROLLED
(i) The professional services required.
(ii) The name, location, and user agency for which the professional services
is required.
(iii) Time and instructions for applicants to submit applications for
employment to the appropriate board.
(iv) General description of the design services sought, and the availability
of details upon request.
(v) The contract term limit set forth in Paragraph (4) of this Subsection.
(vi) The maximum fee and method for calculating total design contract
value, which shall be determined by the division of administration.
(vii) The number of design professionals to be selected.
(e) Any person who desires to be considered for an indefinite delivery and
indefinite quantity professional design services contract may submit data to the
appropriate selection board concerning his experience, previous projects undertaken,
present state projects now being performed by him or his firm for an agency, scope
and amount of work on hand, the names of key personnel who may be assigned to
work under the contract, and any other information that may be appropriate. The
boards may develop standard forms to be used for submitting such data.
(3) An indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity professional design
services contract under this Section shall not include design services for new
buildings. Single task order for renovations shall not exceed thirteen million dollars.
(4) An indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity professional design
services contract issued under this Section shall have a term not to exceed two years
and shall have a maximum total fee of one million dollars.
(5) Amendments to individual task orders issued within the two-year term
of the indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity professional design services contract
may be executed, including after the expiration of the contract and such amendments
may increase the total design contract value, but not the fee, above one million
dollars, provided such amendments shall be related to services necessary for the
completion of ongoing projects.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 755 ENROLLED
(6) Each agency issuing indefinite delivery and indefinite quantity
professional design services contracts under this Section shall maintain a minimum
of two such contracts in effect at all times. Where an agency has only one indefinite
delivery and indefinite quantity professional design services contract in effect, the
agency shall proceed under the provisions of R.S. 38:2316(B)(2) at the next available
selection board. In the event an agency does not comply with the requirements of
this Subsection, no further task orders may be issued on the one indefinite delivery
and indefinite quantity professional design services contract in effect.
C. The provisions of this Section shall not be construed to invalidate or
otherwise impact the validity of any other professional design service contract
regulated by this Title, including design-build or construction manager at risk
contracts.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.